Hawaii statutes.
[§571-96] Visitation and contact.
Unless otherwise ordered by the court and consistent with the best interest of
the child, including safety considerations in cases involving a finding of
domestic violence, any order that anticipates deployment may require that:

(1) The other parent shall make the child reasonably
available to the deploying parent when the deploying parent has leave;

(2) The deployed parent shall provide timely
information regarding the deployed parent's leave schedule;

(3) Both parents shall facilitate opportunities for
telephonic and electronic contact, appropriate for each child, between the
deployed parent and the child during deployment; and

(4) Each parent shall provide immediate notification
to the other parent of a change of address or contact information, or both. [L 2010, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next